Florida, session 2026, HB1179.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 331.3261, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
331.3261 Information relating to confidential trade
secrets.—Any trade secret as defined in s. 812.081(1) held by
Space Florida, any spaceport user, or any space industry
business is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. If Space Florida
determines that any information requested by the public will
reveal a trade secret, Space Florida shall inform, in writing,
the person making the request of that determination. The
determination is a final order as defined in s. 120.52. Any
meeting or portion thereof of the board of directors of Space
Florida during which a confidential and exempt trade secret is
discussed is exempt from s. 286.011 and s. 24(b), Art. I of the
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1179 2026
State Constitution. Any public record generated during such
meeting or portion thereof, such as minutes, tape recordings, or
notes, is confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s.
24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This section is subject
to the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s.
119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless
reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the
Legislature.
Section 2. The Legislature finds that it is a public
necessity that any trade secret as defined in s. 812.081(1),
Florida Statutes, held by Space Florida, any spaceport user, and
any space industry business be made confidential and exempt from
s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a), Article I of the
State Constitution. Trade secrets, including, but not limited
to, proprietary confidential business information such as secret
processes, manufacturing and production methods, and potential
and existing trade secrets embodied in pending patent
applications, are a valuable asset that enable innovation and
provide a competitive advantage in the marketplace. Disclosure
of such trade secrets could injure Space Florida, spaceport
users, and space industry businesses in the marketplace by
revealing proprietary confidential business information to
competitors. The space industry is a key component of this
state's economy, and the harm that may result from the release
of such trade secrets significantly outweighs any public benefit
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1179-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1179 2026
that may be derived from the disclosure of such information. The
ability to protect trade secrets is critical to attracting and
retaining aerospace businesses in this state, which, in turn,
creates high-wage jobs and economic growth. Furthermore, the
Legislature finds that it is a public necessity that any meeting
and portion thereof of the board of directors of Space Florida
during which a confidential and exempt trade secret is discussed
be made exempt from s. 286.011, Florida Statutes, and s. 24(b),
Article I of the State Constitution and any public record
generated during such meeting and portion thereof, such as
minutes, tape recordings, and notes, be made confidential and
exempt under s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 24(a),
Article I of the State Constitution. Without these exemptions,
Space Florida, spaceport users, and space industry businesses
would be placed at a competitive disadvantage with respect to
the disclosure of valuable trade secrets, thereby harming the
economic development efforts of this state.
Section 3. This act shall take effect on the same date
that HB 1177 or similar legislation takes effect, if such
legislation is adopted in the same legislative session or an
extension thereof and becomes a law.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1179-00